Washington statutes.
RCW 27.54.010

Membership. (Expires June 30, 2027.)

(1) The semiquincentennial committee is established with members as provided in this subsection:

(a) The president of the senate shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the senate;

(b) The speaker of the house of representatives shall appoint one member from each of the two largest caucuses of the house of representatives;

(c) The lieutenant governor, or their designee;

(d) The secretary of state, or their designee;

(e) The superintendent of public instruction, or their designee;

(f) The director of the governor's office of Indian affairs, or their designee;

(g) The director of the Washington state historical society, or their designee;

(h) The director of the eastern Washington state historical society, or their designee;

(i) The director of the department of archaeology and historic preservation, or their designee;

(j) The director of Washington state parks, or their designee;

(k) The director of the department of commerce, or their designee;

(l) The director of the Washington state arts commission, or their designee;

(m) One member selected by the commission on African American affairs;

(n) One member selected by the commission on Asian American affairs;

(o) One member selected by the commission on Hispanic affairs;

(p) One member selected by the LGBTQ commission;

(q) One member selected by the women's commission;

(r) One member representing humanities Washington, appointed by the governor.

(2) The committee may invite additional persons it deems necessary to serve as honorary members of the committee.

(3) The lieutenant governor shall serve as chair of the committee.

[ 2022 c 97 s 1.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2022 c 97: "This act expires June 30, 2027." [ 2022 c 97 s 6.]